Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1704
Authorized attorney, defined.

Authorized attorney shall mean an attorney (1) employed by the county subject to the approval of the county board, (2) employed by the Department of Health and Human Services, or (3) appointed by the court, who is authorized to investigate and prosecute child, spousal, and medical support cases. An authorized attorney shall represent the state as provided in section 43-512.03.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 24;

Laws 1987, LB 573, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 20;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 65;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 202;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 78.